Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
EMERGENCY BOARD
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 167 (1), chapter 669, Oregon Laws  2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for allocation for the  state’s natural disaster prevention,
preparedness, response and recovery activities, is decreased by $98,725,000.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 265 (1), chapter 669, Oregon Laws  2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for allocation to  the Oregon Health Authority for dental rates
for medical assistance programs, is decreased by $19,000,000.
HOUSING
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 76, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses by the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus  State Fiscal Recovery
Fund moneys  received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for expendi-
tures and activities to respond to the COVID-19 public health emergency  and its economic
impacts, is increased by $115,000,000.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the  maximum limits for payment
of expenses by the Housing and Community Services Department from American Rescue
Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received by the  Oregon Depart-
ment of  Administrative Services and transferred to the Housing and Community Services
Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Oregon Emergency Rental
Assistance Program .................. $100,000,000
(2) Program delivery expenses
related to expediting and
enhancing Oregon Emergency
Enrolled Senate Bill 5561 (SB 5561-INTRO) Page 1
Rental Assistance Program
application evaluation and
payment .................................... $ 5,000,000
(3) Grant to Home Forward
for distributions to
compensate landlords pursuant
to section 9, chapter 420,
Oregon Laws 2021 ..................... $ 10,000,000
SECTION 4a.
In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $100,000,000, for local emergency rental as-
sistance programs and eviction prevention and diversion services.
DROUGHT
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $40,000,000, for deposit into  the Oregon Agricultural Dis-
aster Relief Fund established under section 5,  chapter , Oregon Laws 2021 (second
special session) (Enrolled Senate Bill 892).
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$40,000,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Agriculture from the State Oregon Agricultural
Disaster Relief Fund established  under section 5, chapter 
, Oregon Laws 2021 (second
special session) (Enrolled Senate Bill 892).
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000, for grasshopper  and cricket suppression efforts.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys  allocated
from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to the State  Department of Agriculture for the
Oregon Plan, to be used for activities and projects to implement Article XV,  section 4b, of
the Oregon Constitution, is increased  by $1,000,000, for grasshopper and cricket suppression
efforts.
SECTION 9. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for distribution to  the following irri-
gation districts:
(1) North Unit Irrigation
District...................................... $ 5,500,000
(2) Ochoco Irrigation District ........ $ 214,000
(3) Rogue River Valley
Irrigation District ..................... $ 48,000
(4) Talent Irrigation District .......... $ 190,000
(5) Medford Irrigation District ....... $ 135,000
(6) Deschutes Basin Board
of Control .................................. $ 36,000
SECTION 10. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the following amounts for distribution to the following
cities and counties to provide domestic and community well assistance:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5561 (SB 5561-INTRO) Page 2
(1) Prairie City ............................... $ 400,000
(2) City of Sodaville ........................ $ 60,000
(3) Jackson County......................... $ 954,800
(4) Deschutes County ..................... $ 585,200
SECTION 11. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000, for distribution to the Klamath
Project Drought Response Agency for irrigation district assistance.
SECTION 12.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $4,000,000, for distribution to Klamath
County to provide domestic and community well assistance.
SECTION 13. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for distribution  to the Klamath
Tribes for the following purposes:
(1) Aquatic resource inventory
and restoration work to
determine the impact of
wildfire and drought on
Sprague River tributaries
and Klamath Lake .................... $ 475,000
(2) Cultural resource inventory
and assessment of lands
impacted by the Bootleg Fire ... $ 1,500,000
(3) Adaptation to chronic
drought and persistent fire
conditions, including
wildlife management and
game enforcement; wildfire
restoration, monitoring and
risk reduction; and forest
management and restoration .... $ 6,600,000
(4) Emergency management
staffing and equipment ............. $ 1,100,000
SECTION 14.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000,  for distribution to the Oregon
Worker Relief Coalition for direct payments to agricultural workers who  miss work due to
extreme heat or smoke.
SECTION 15. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $1,500,000, for distribution to the Oregon
Community Food  Systems Network to provide grants to small-scale farmers impacted by
drought, heat or wildfire, who are unable  to access federal disaster relief funds or loans from
the Oregon Agricultural Disaster Relief Fund established under section 5, chapter ,
Oregon Laws 2021 (second special session) (Enrolled Senate Bill 892).
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (8), chapter 660, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for public university statewide programs,
is increased by $250,000, for distribution to Oregon State University for the Oregon  Climate
Change Research Institute for Oregon Climate Service research.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5561 (SB 5561-INTRO) Page 3
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (9), chapter 660, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  for statewide public services, is increased
by the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) $500,000 for distribution to the Oregon State University  Extension Service to provide
technical assistance  to small-scale farmers and ranchers in accessing state and federal as-
sistance programs.
(2) $500,000 for distribution to the Oregon State University  Extension Service to provide
education, marketing and technical assistance for drought-resistant crops and  conservation
and efficiency infrastructure.
(3) $250,000 for distribution to the Oregon State University  Extension Service to work
closely with commodity commissions to survey producers around the state.
(4) $250,000 for distribution to  the Oregon State University College of Agricultural Sci-
ences to conduct soil health research.
SECTION 18. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Water Resources Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $300,000, to contract for a statewide  drought vulnerability
assessment.
SECTION 19. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,627,000, to provide matching grants to irrigation
districts to support investments in irrigation modernization projects.
SECTION 19a.
In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund,  the amount of $2,000,000, to provide matching grants to North Unit
Irrigation District to support investments in irrigation modernization projects.
SECTION 20. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount  of $1,000,000, to provide grants for drought resiliency
projects in Jefferson County.
SECTION 21. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, to  provide grants for livestock watering
wells and construction of off-channel water facilities in Klamath County.
SECTION 22. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount  of $1,000,000, to provide grants for drought resiliency
work in Klamath County.
SECTION 23. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of  $3,000,000, for distribution to the Jefferson County
Soil and Water Conservation  District to support stewardship practices on irrigated land that
is at high risk for erosion  and soil degradation, and to limit proliferation of noxious and
invasive weeds.
SECTION 23a. In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  out of
the General Fund, the amount of $3,750,000, for  deposit into the Water Well Abandonment,
Repair and Replacement Fund established by ORS 537.766.
SECTION 23b. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter 665,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
Enrolled Senate Bill 5561 (SB 5561-INTRO) Page 4
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 665,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for technical services, is increased by $3,750,000,  for authorized expenditures of moneys de-
posited in  the Water Well Abandonment, Repair and Replacement Fund established by ORS
537.766.
CANNABIS  ENFORCEMENT
SECTION 24. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of  $20,000,000, for deposit into the Illegal Marijuana
Market Enforcement Grant Program Fund established  under section 15, chapter 103, Oregon
Laws 2018.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter 379, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, is increased by  $20,000,000,
for additional grants under the Illegal Marijuana  Market Enforcement Grant Program es-
tablished under section 13, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018.
SECTION 26.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  out of
the General Fund, the  amount of $5,000,000, for the expansion and enhancement of water
rights enforcement activities.
OTHER
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health  systems, health policy and analytics, and public
health, is increased by $19,000,000,  for increasing payments to dental care providers for
medical assistance program costs.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$12,876,072, for case management services, rental  assistance, immigration and legal services,
and interpretation classes for refugees from Afghanistan.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (1), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for central services, is increased by $5,362,590, to
provide short-term food and shelter for refugees from Afghanistan.
SECTION 30. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $10,000,000, for distribution to the Oregon
Tourism Commission to support a  program to provide grants to outdoor recreation outfitters
and guides financially impacted by restrictions related to the COVID-19 pandemic  or by ser-
vice disruptions related to drought or wildfire.
SECTION 31. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Education, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  out of the
Enrolled Senate Bill 5561 (SB 5561-INTRO) Page 5
General Fund, the amount of  $2,000,000, for youth development programs for the East Metro
Outreach, Prevention, and Intervention (EMOPI) program.
SECTION 32. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $14,000,000, for equal distribution to the
Cities of Albany, Ashland, Beaverton, Bend, Corvallis,  Eugene, Grants Pass, Gresham,
Hillsboro, Medford, Portland, Redmond,  Salem and Springfield, for programs or services that
address housing insecurity, lack of affordable housing or homelessness.
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Long Term  Care Ombudsman by section 1 (1), chapter 521, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  general program and services provided to care
facility residents, is decreased by $75,148.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Long Term  Care Ombudsman by section 1 (2), chapter 521, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for public guardian and conservator program, is in-
creased by $75,148.
SECTION 35.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for distribution to the Port of
Portland to support an Oregon mass timber modular housing prototype project.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 36. The unit captions used in this 2021 second special session Act are  provided
only for the convenience of the reader and do not become part of  the statutory law of this
state or express  any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 second special session
Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 37. This 2021 second special session Act being necessary for the immediate
preservation of the  public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this 2021 second special session Act takes effect on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5561 (SB 5561-INTRO) Page 6
Passed by Senate December 13, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House December 13, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5561 (SB 5561-INTRO) Page 7